ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/cs_CZ/hyph_cs_CZ.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN ',’
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
9-/=-,1,1
.a2
.as1t1
.b2
.k2
.kří1d
.kř2
.e2
.es1t
.exi3stuje.
.exis1t
.exis1tu1j
.exi3stují.
.existu1jí
.c2
.ch2
.cyk1
.1cy
.d2
.dej1
.do3v
.1do
.do1s2
.3do1t2
.1dý1
.nech2
.1nec
.ne3c2ht
.ná1h
.ná3ř2
.l2
.m2
.mou1
.1mo2ud1
.my4s2l.
.my1s
.o2
.ob1ř
.ode1
.od1l
.os1tr
.os1tř
.ot1v
.v2
.vet2
.vši3m2l.
.1v2š2
.v1ši
.i2
.ih2
.is1l
.is2t
.i1g3
.r2
.ro1de
.h2
.u2
.un2
.uv2
.s2
.se1l
.1se
.t2
.1té1
.č2
.fes1
.1g2
.ge1
.ž2
.é2
.p2
.pa1t1ř
.pod3ro1bí
.pod3ro1bi
.po3č
.poje3dl
.po1je
.pro3s1té
.pro1
.pu1b
.1pý1
.š2
.še1t
.z2
.za3č2
.1za1
.zd2
.j2
.je2d2l.
.ú2
2a.
a1a
ab1la
ab1le
ab2li
a1bo
ab1ri
ab1rý
a1bu
a1bý
a1bá
a1bě
1akcem
a2k1c
ak1ce1
a1kl
ak3li
a1ko
ak1vi
a1ki
ak1rop
a1ku
a1ký
a1ká
a1ké
a1e
ae1le
a1c
a2ct2
a2db
adko1
a2d1k
a1de
a1dle
a1dl2u
ad1lé
a1d2mu1
ad1re
a1dě
a1ne
a1ne1d
an1es
an2sp
a2n1s
a1ná
a1ně
a1la
a1le
a1lí
a1lo
al1h
a1l2u
a1ly
a1lý
al1s2
a1lá
al3ží
al2ž
a1lé
a3m3kn
a2m1k2
am1n
a1mí
a1ml
a1mo
a1mo1s
a1my
a1mů
am1s2
a1mě
a1m2ž
a1mé
a1o
ao1k
ao2na
ao2te
a1va
a1ve
a1ví
av3le
av2l
av3lo
av1m
a1vo
a1vi
a1vr
a1vu
a1vý
a1vů
a1vá
a3vč
a1vě
a1vž2
a1vé
a1ia
ai2ne
a1i1z
a1ra
a1re
ar1c
ar2cha
a1ro
arou2š
aro2u
ar1v
a1ri
a1rr
a1ru1
a1ry
a1rý
a1rů
arůs1
a1rá
a1h
ah2nut
ah1nu
a2u1ku
au2ká
au1le
au1r
aus1t
a1uč
au1čil
au3j2
a1yo
a1sa
a3sb
as1k
as1n
a1sla
as1lý
a2si.
a1si
as1to1k
as1to1v
as1t1v
as1t2u.
as1tě
a1sá
a1ta
ata1s
at1k2
2a1te
a1tí
a1to
a1t1r2a.
at1re
at1ro1v
at1ru
at1rů
a1tu
a1ty
a1tá
a1tě
at1ř
a1ča
a1če
a3čne
a2č1n
a3č1ni
a1čo
a1či
a1fi
af1to
a1ff
1a2ge
a1g
a3gn
ag1ne
ag1ro
a1ži
a1p
a2p1n
apo1š
apro2
apros1
a2p1ru
a2p1sy
a2ř1k2
a1ře
a1ří
a1řo
a1ři
a1řu
a1řá
a1ša
a1še
aš3li
a1š2t
az1b
az1k2
az2d
az1l
az1m2
az2ma
a1zv
a1zý
a1zp2
a1j
aje1s
a2j1s2
a2j1z1
a1ú
aú1t
a1ó
aťa1
a1w
a1x
2b.
1b2a.
ba1b
ba1ka
1ban
ba2ne
ba2hn
ba1h
bah1r
ba1sta
1ba1j
b1k2
bka1
1be.
be1k1á
2becný.
be2c1n
bec1ný
1ben
be1ne
be1le
be1lh
1bem
be1v
1ber
be1h
bes1k
1bet
beš2
bez1k2
be1zn
bez1m2
be2z1o
bez1v
bez1t2
be1jm
2b1c
b1dr
2b1n
1bí
b1lek
b1leh
b1leč
1bli2k.
b1li
bl2ik
b1lé1k
b1lé1h
b1m
1boa
bo1de
1bol
1boo
bo1h
bo2h2n
bo1če
1boň
b1v
b1vy2
1bi
bi2b1
bis1
bis1t2
bi1t1v
b1r2a.
bra1d
b2ran
b3ra2n1n
b2ral
b1ra1h
b1ra1j
1bri1ko
br2ik
2b1ry
b1rák
1brá2k.
b2rán
b1ré
b1ha
b1hl
bu1k
bu1dě
bu1le
bu1lo
bu1v
bus1to
bu1t
bu1š
1by.
1by1r
by2s
by3sl
bys1t
by2z
1bý.
1bů
2b1s2
bst2
b1t
1bá.
1bám
1bár
b1č
1bě.
bě1ta
1běž
1běj
b1ž
1bé
b1řa
1bří2k.
1bří1če
1bři
b1š
b1z
b1j
2k.
ka1be
ka2ch
ka1c
ka1d
ka1na
ka1me
1ka1mi
1kav
1kai
ka1ž1d
ka2pl
ka1p
ka2pr
ka2ps
ka2š
k1k
1ke
ke1ne
ke1le
2k1c
k1ce1
1k2d
2kn
k1ne
k3no
k1ná
k1něm
k1nět
3kněž
3kněz
1k2l.
k1le.
k1lej
k1lí.
k2li
k4lin
3klist2ik
klis1t
klis1ti
1klus
kl2u
k1ly
2k1lý
k1lé
kmo1
ko1b1r
ko1ka
ko1my
1kor
ko1ri
1ko1h
ko1sl
kos3te
kot1v
2koč
ko1če
ko1či
ko1f
2k2o1g
ko1pa
ko1pe
ko1po
ko1pr
ko1pu
ko1pá
1koš
ko1šk
1koj
ko2j1m
1k2r.
1kr1m
k1rob
k2roč
1kr1v
1krh
kr2sk
k2rs
k1rá.
ku1k
ku1c
ku1le
ku1lo
k2u1ro
ku1č
ku1pa
ku1po
ku1př
ku1š
1ku1j
1ky
3ky1d
3ky1n
ky2sl
ky1s
1ků
3ků.
2ks
k1ta
k1to
k1tr
kt1ra
k1t1ros
kt1ru
k1tu
k1ty
k1tá
k1tě
k1tř
1kác
2kč
k1če
k1či
2k1f
k1ž
kř2
k3řk2
k2š
k1ú
kú1r
kút1
e1a1c
e1an
e1al
ea1me
e1ar
e1ač
e1a1g
e1ba
e1be
e3ber
e1bu
e1by
e1bý
e1bá
e1bě
eb1ř
e1ka
e3k1ni
e2kn
ek1l2a.
ek1lem
ek1l2o.
ek3li.
ek2li
ek1l2u
e1klá
e1kv
e1kr
e1ký
e1ká
e1ké
e1em
e1e1s
e1e1x
eexi4
e1ca
e1ch2l.
e1ch2o
e1ch2v
e1chi
e1chu
e1chá
e1cy1
e1de
ed1la
ed1le
ed1lo
ed1ly
e2dob
e1do
ed1ob1r
edo1s
e3do1t2
ed1vo
ed1vi
ed1vě
ed1ra
ed1re
e1dě
e1dř
e1na
enau1
e1n1v
e1nr
ent1ra
e2nt
en1tr
e1ná
e1ně
e1la
e1le.
e1lí
el3le
el2l
e1lo
e1l2u
e1ly
e1lý
el1s2
e1lá
e1l2ž
e1lé
e1l2z
e1me
e1md
em1n
e1mí
e1ml
e1mo
emo1k
emo4hl
e1mr
e1my
e1mů
em1s2
e1mě
e1o
eo1be
eo3bra1ny
eob1r
eob2ran
eo1by
eo1bá
e2ok
eo1ka
eo1c
eo1de
eo1dě
e3ologii
eo1lo
eol2o1g
eor2
eo1h
eo1s
eo1t
eo1č
eo1f
eo1p
eo1z
e3vk
e1ve
e1vd
evde1
e1ví
e1v2l
e1vo
evo1s
e1vi
ev1ro
e1vu
e1vy3
e1vý
e1vů
e3vs
e1vá
e1vě
e1vé
e1iř
e1ra
e2r1akt
e1re
e1ro
e3ron
e1r2vá
e1ri
e1ru
e1ry
e1rý
e1rů
e2r1s
e1rá
e1ré
e1ha
e1he
eh3c
eh3ne
e1h2l.
e1h2m
e1h2o
e1hr
e1hu
e1hy
e1há
e1hř
e1u1
eu2če
ey1
e1sa
es1bo
e2sb
es1ka
es1ko
e1skr
es1k2u.
es3ky
es1ký
es1ké
e1sch2
es1le
e1slou
e1slyš
e1sm
es2ma
es2mi
e3smě
e1sv
e1sh2
e1sy
e1stav
e2s1te
e2stí
es1to1v
e1stil
es1ti
es1t3r2a.
es1t2u.
es1ty.
es1tě.
e1sá
e1sč
e1sp
e2s1př
e1ta
e1tí
et1la
et1l2u1
e1to
e1tr
e1t1r2a.
et1ro
e2t1ri
et1ru
et1rů
e1tu
e1ty
e1tá
e1tě
et1ří
et1ři
e1t1ň
e1á
e1ča
eč3k
e1če
e1čo
e1či
e1fi
ef1ré
e2fr
ef1t
eg1ru
e1g
e1ža
e3ž2no
e2ž1n
e1ži
e1p
epa1t
e3pe
e2p3n
epo1dr
epo1je2
e3pr
ep1ty
e2pt
e3pá
epři1
epřil3
e1ř
e3ře
eš2k2a.
eš1ka
e1ško
eš2ku
e1še
e1šl
e1šá
e1ňá
ezar3m
e1za1
ezar2
eza3č2
ezač3no
eza2č1n
ez1bo
ez1de
ez1dr
e3zdě
ez1la
ez1me
ezm2
ez1v2l
e1zr
e1zh
ez1p2
ez3pe
e1zř
e1zj
ej1ak
e1je
ej2mi.
ej1mi
e1j2mu
ej1mě
ej1ob
ej1oh
ej1o1t
e1ú1
eú3n
eú3s
2c.
ca1d
ca3n
cas1t
2c1k2
1ce
ce1dr
ce1le
ce1l2l
ce1mé
ce1v
ce2u1
ce1sl
ces1to
c1c
c1d
2c1n
1cí
c1l
cle2
2cm
c1mé
1co
co1b
co1p
1cv
1ci
ci1a
ci1d
ci3n1n
2c2h.
1cha
3cha1i
1che
1ch2c
2ch1n
ch1lí
1chou
ch2o
1ch2r.
1ch2u.
1chy
2ch1s2
2ch1ty
c2ht
1chtě
1cu
cuk1
1cy
1ců
ct2
c2ta
c1tv
c1ti1
c1tá
1cá
1c1č
cé1
1c2p
c1ň
2d.
1da
da1ka
da1d
da1me
d1bl
d1bo
d1bu
d1by
1dbá
d1bě
2d1k
de2a
de1br
de1kl
de1ko
3del
de1le
de2o
de2o1k
de1v
2dei
1der
de3r1s
de1h
de2u1
de1sl
de3stin
des1ti
de1f
de1z
de1j2d
1dex
d1c
d1d
2d1n
4d3níc
d1ní
d2ní1v
1dí
1d2l.
1dlec
d1leh
d1let
d1leš
1d2l1n
d1lí
d1lom
d1lož
d1lý
d2lů
d1lá
d1lé1h
d1lét
1dlň
1d2m1k2
1dmd
1dmn
d1mí
d1ml
d1mo
d1mu1
d1my
d1mě
d1mé
1do
do1ba
do3b2rat
dob1r
do1by
do1bý
do1bá
do1bě
dob1ř
do1ka
do1kl
do1kr
do1c
do3d2
do1m
do1h
do1sl
do1sv
do3sti2v.
dos1ti
do3sti1vý
do1sp
3dot2
do1tv
do1tá
do1tč
do1č
do1ži
do1p
do1š
do1z
do1j
dva1
d1ve
d1víd
d1v2l
d1vr
d1vá
d1vé
1di
dia1
di1ím
di2on
di1om
di1sl
di1s1ti
dis1t
di1š
d2ral
d2ren
1drc
1dro2b1n
d1ro1bo
dri2
d1rý
1drt
2d1h
1du
du1ko
du1c
d1um
2d1ur1č
du1p
du1še
1dy
1dý
1dů
dů1s
2d1s2
d2s3m
d1t
1dá
d1č
d2č3t
1dě.
1dě1b
1děk
dě1lo1
1dě1p
d2ž
1dé
d1p
dpad2ly
d1řa
d1řel
1dřej
d1řo
d1ři
d1řu
d1š2
3d2šený.
d1šen
dše1ný
d1ň
d1z
d2za1
d1j
1dó
d1w
2n.
1n2a.
na1b
na3c
na1d1v
na1dr
1nan
na1me
na1i
na1r2v
na1uk
na1s
nas3ti
na1tr
na1t1ř
na1č2t
1na1g
na1š
na1zn
na1z1m2
1naď
2n1b
2n1k
n2kt
1ne.
ne1a
ne1b
1nek
ne2k2d
ne1kl
ne1ko
ne1ku
1nec
1ned
ne1db
ne1d1le
ne3do
ne1dr
ne1ne
1nel
ne1le
ne1lh
nem2
ne1m1n
ne1mé
ne3o
1ne3v2
ne1i
ne1h
ne1sku
ne1sn
ne1st
net2
ne1tv
ne1tř
1nef
ne1š1ka
ne1št
ne1šť
ne3z2
ne2jet
ne1je
2n1c
n1cy1
n1d
n2d1l2u
2ndr
n2dur
n1du
nd1ř
2n1n
3n2ne
3n1ni
n2n1s1
1ní
3níc
2n1l
1no
3n2o.
no1b
no1k
no1d
no1my
no1is
noi2
no1h
no1tá
no1po
no1zn
n1v
n1ves1
1ni
ni1ak
ni1k2t
n2ik
ni1el
ni1sa
ni1sl
ni1s1t
ni1st3re
ni1st1ř
2nitř
ni1š
n1ri
n1ru
n1rů
n1h
1nu
nu1ko
nu1le
nu1lo
nu1lé
nu1i
nut1k2
3nu1j
1ny
1ný
1nů
2n1s
n2sa
n1s1ak
nsko1s2
ns2t
n2sf
ns1pa
ns1po
2nt
n1ta
nt1k2
n1to
n1tr
nt1re
nt1ro
nt2ro1v
nt1ric
nt1ru
nt1rá
n1tu
n1ty
n1tá
n1tě
ná1dr
1nál
náh1la
ná1s2
ná1tl
ná1zn
2nč
n1če
n1čo
n1či
1ně.
1něk
1ně1n
1něč
n1f
n3fr
n3gy
n1g
n1ž
1né
n1p
n1š2
n1z
n2zn
n1j
n1ď
n1x
í1b
íb1re
íb1ř
í1ka
í1kl
í1ko
í1ku
í1ká
í1ch2o
í1chu
í1chů
í1chá
í1de
íd1l
í1dly
í1d3lů
í1dě
í1na
í1ne
í1ná
í1ně
í1l
í1me
ím1n
í1mo
í1mě
í1mé
í1v
í1ra
í1re
í1ro
í1ru
í1ry
í1rů
í1rá
í1h
í2h1n
í2h1l
í1sa
ís1k
ís1n
ís1la
ís1le
ís2li
ís1ly
ís1m
ís1tí
ís1to
ís1t2u.
ís1ty
ís2tý
ís1tě
ís2té
í1sp
í1t
í2t1k2
ít1ra
ít1ře
í2tří
í1ča
íč3k
í1če
í1čo
í1či
í1ža
í1ži
í1p
í1ř
í2ř1k2
í1še
íš1t
íš1ť
í1ňa
íz1k2
íz1de
íz1ne
í2zně
íz1la
í1je
í1jm
í1ť
2l.
la1ba
la1ka
la1kr
la1me
la1sy
l2a3te
lač3t
1lař
l1b
lba1
1l1bi
2l1k
le1bo
le1br
le1ko
le1ne
le2o
le1va
le3sb
le2tra
le1tr
leč3t
1lef
le2g1r
le1g
1leň
lez1n
2l1c
l1de
l1dr
l1dř
2l1n
3l2ne
1lnu1la
l1nu
1l2nět
1líc
1lí1t
2líž
1lí1ř
1líš
líz1n
l2l
1lli.
l1li
1lly
l1m
lo1bě
lo1k
lo1de
lo1dě
lo1my
lo1o
1lo2vk
lo1v
lo1ri
lo1ha
2lou1h
lou2s
lou1č
1los
lo1sl
lo1sv
lo1č
lo1ži
lo1pa
lo1pe
3lopedie
lope1di
lo1po
lo1z
l1v
l1ves1
1li
3likace.
l2ik
li1ka
lika1c
lika1ce
li1kl
3likovat
li1ko
liko1v
li1ch
3li1ná
li1h
li1sa
li1sm
li1sta
lis1t
2liž
li1ště
liš1t
li2zn
li1z
l1r
lho1s
lh2o
l1hu
l1hy
l1hř
l2u
lu1bu
lu1by
lu1ka
lu1ko
lu1ká
lu1c
lu1ne
lu1lé
lu1va
lu1vo
lu1vi
lu1vá
lu1vě
lui1
lu1ha
lu1he
lu1hr
1lu2s.
l1u1čo
lu1či
lu1p
lu1še
lýt1
1lů
ls2
l1sk
lst2
l1t
lt2ry2
1lá.
2láž
2l1č
l1fi
lgo1
l1g
l2ž
1lé.
1lé1c
l1pi
l1pá
l1š2
l1ňá
lz1n
l1j
1ló
2m.
1ma
mak1r
ma1dl
ma1na
mav2
mas3k
ma1sy
ma1tl
ma1t1r
ma4gn
ma1g
m1b
mb1ro
2m1k2
3m2kn
m2kl
1mec
me1ne
me1le
me2o1p
me1o
1mes
1mez
1mej
1mew
me1x
m1c
m1de
m3na
mna2s
m3ní.
m1ní
m1ni1
m3ny
m3ný
m1ná
m3né
1mí2r.
1mí1ru
ml1h
ml3ž
m2ma
m1mo
m2mi
1m2o.
mo1ch
1mod
mo1de
mod1l
1mor
mo1ha
1mo2ud
1mos
mos1tu
mo1sp
mo1tá
1moč
mo1če
mo1či
mo1p
m1v
1mi
mi1d1l
mi1l2l
mi1o3v
mi1sm
mi1s1ti
mis1t
mi3st2r.
mi3st2ra
mi3strů
1mu
mu1k
mu1c
mu1d
mu1n1g
mu1le
mum1
muh1
mu2si2l.
mu1si
mu1č
2muš
my1c
myo1
mys1lo
my1s
1myš1
1mý
ms2
m1sk
m1stv
m1t
1má
má2s1
m1če1ní
1mělil
mě1li
1měm
měš1
m1f
1mé.
1mé1ně
m1p
mp1ly
1mř
m1š2
mz2
m1j
1mó
1mw
2o.
oa2k1
o1a1l
o1af
o1a1p
obe1s
ob1d
ob1la
ob1lí
ob1lo
o1bo
ob1r
o1bu
ob1ří
o2k1n
o1km
o1ko
ok1vo
o1ku
o1ký
o1ká
o1ké
o1kř2
o1e
oev1
o1chá
o1cy1
ocyk2
o1dec
ode1s
od1la
od1l2o.
od1ly
od1v
odi1a1
o1di
od1ra
o1dru
od1rá
o1dr1ž
od1ré
o1d2ž
od1ř
o1na
o1ne
on2do
on1d
o2nd1r
o1nu1
o2n3s
o1ná
oně1mí
o1la
o1le
ole3d1n
ole1sl
o1lí
o1l2l
o1lo
oli1s1t
o1li
o2lič
o1l2u
o1ly
ol1s2
o1lá
olá3r
o1lé
o1me
om2n
om3no
o1mí
o1ml
o1mo
o1mr
o1mh
o1mů
o1mě
o1mé
o1ob
oo2k
oo1de
o1o1v
o1or
o1o1p
o1o1ř
o1v
ovy2p1
o1vy1
o2vt
o1v2š2
ov3še
oi2
o1i3de
o1in
o1ra
o1re
or1c
o1ro
oro3p
o1ru
o1ry
o1rů
o2r1s
o1rá
oh2n
o3h2l.
o1h2m
o1h2o
o1hu
o1hy
o1hý
o1hů
o1há
o1hé
o1hř
ou2bík
ou1bí
ou1ka
ou1ko
ou1kr
ou1ká
ou1ch
o2ud
ou1dr
ou1dě
ou1ne
ou1l
ou1m
ou1v
ou1r
ou1h
ou1sa
ous1k
ou1sl
o2ut
ou1ta
ou1tě
ou1či
ou1ž
ou1pa
ou1po2
ou1pr
ou1pá
ou1še
ou1š1t
ouz1d
o1sa
o2s1b
o1sk
o2s1ku
os1n
o2síš
o1sí
os1ly
os1me
o1sh2
o1sy
o1stav
os2tel
os1te
o2s2ti1li
os1ti
o3sti1vá
ost3rav
os1trý
os1t3rá.
os1ty
o1stá
os1tě.
o2s1tět
o2s1té
o3sté1mu
os1tří
o1sf
o1ta
otek1
o1te
o1tí
ot1le
o1to
ot1va
ot1ví
o3ti
o1tra
otres1
ot1ro
ot1rá
o1th
o1tu
o1ty
o1t2t
o1tě
o1á
o1ča
oč2k
o1čo
o1fe
2o1g
o3gy
o1ža
o2p3n
o1pí
opo1le1
o1pi
opro2s
opro1
o1pů
o1př
o1p1ň
o1ř
o2ř1k2
oři2s2
o1šká
o1še
o1šl
oš1tu
o1ňa
oz1ba
oz1bo
oz1ka
ozk2
oz1kl
oz1kol
oz1kv
oz1ku
oz1ká
oze3d
o1ze
o2z1dí
oz1dm
o2z1dě
oz2ní
oz1ně
oz1l
oz1me
ozm2
oz1mí
oz1mo
oz1mů
oz1vo
oz1vi
oz1vr
oz1ro
oz1ru
oz1rů
oz1h
oz1t2
oz1p2
o1zř
oz1j
o1ja
o1je
oje3d1la
o1j2d
o1jme
oj3mu
oj1mů
o1jo
o1ju
o1j1ň
o1ú
o1ťa
o1xe
o1xo1
2v.
1vam
va2vř
v2a3te
va1t1r
vaz1n
v1b
2vk
v1ka
v1ko
v1ku
v1ká
1vek
ve1d1le
ve1dv
ve1dr
1ven
ve1le
ve2ro
ve2rů
1ves
ve2sm
ves1mí
ve2p1ř
ve1p
ve2š1lo
ve1šl
ve1j2d
vej1m
2vc
v2dá
2v1n
1vín
1ví1ru
1víj
v2l
v3l2a.
v3lík
v3lín
v3ly
v3lů
vo1b
1vok
vo1de
vo1dě
vo1ri
vous2
vo1sl
vo2si
vo1sta
vo1tř
vo1č
voz3n
vi1d
3vida1ce
vi1da
vida1c
1vi1do
vi1hl
1vi1su
vi1sta
vis1t
2vi2s1té
vi1š1t
vi2zn
vi1z
vrd1l
v2rd
3vrně1no
v2r1n
vr3ně
vr1ně1n
vrst1v
v2rs
vrs3tva
v1ha
vu1ko
vu1n
1vy1
vyč2
vy3pt
vy1p
vy3ř
vý3s
vý1t
1vý1z
2vs
v1sk
v1stv
2vč
v1či
vě1h
vě1ta
vž2
vpad1
1vř
v1řín
1v2š2
v1ň
1v2z2
1vó
ia1b
i1a1c
i1a1d
i1an
i1ar
i1at
i1b
i3ble
ib1r
i2bru
ib1ří
2ik
i1ka
i2k1n
ik1l2a.
ik1le
ik1lo
ik3li
i1ko
i1kv
i1ki
i1kr
ik1ro
i1ku
i1ký
i1ká
i1ké
i1k1ú
i1en
i1em
i1er
ie1s
ie1se2
ies1t
i1et
i1ca
i2cek
i1ce
ich1l
i1ch2o
i1chi
i1dec
i1dem
i1dl
id1le.
i1dr
i1dě
i1d3ž
i1d1z
i1na
i1ne
inej1
in2na
i2n1n
i1ná
i1ně
1in1f
i1íc
i1la
i1lbu
il1b
i1le
i4l2nu
i2l1n
i1lí
i1lo
i1l2u
i1ly
i1lý
